Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7908.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-12-23.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-12 entitled
"Department of Human Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-12-23.1. Quality of early care and education and school-age child care through
voluntary quality rating system.
(a) There is hereby established a voluntary quality rating system which will assess quality
in early care and education programs and school-age child care. For purposes of this section, early
care and education programs and school-age child care shall mean programs licensed under chapter
12.5 of title 42 and approved under chapter 48 of title 16, including, without limitation, childcare
centers, family childcare homes, group family childcare homes, school-age childcare programs and
preschools, but excluding child placement agencies. The voluntary quality rating system is
established to promote continuous quality improvement of programs and to further the goals of
Rhode Island’s “starting right” initiative.
(b) The department of human services, the department of children, youth and families, the
department of health, the department of elementary and secondary education, and other partners
and agencies shall share information and work cooperatively with the Rhode Island quality rating
system, a public-private partnership, to ensure that Rhode Island children have access to quality
early care and education programs and school-age child care.
(c) The voluntary quality rating system shall also provide a mechanism to gather data about

program quality, and shall report this information to parents, providers, and other persons interested
in the quality of early care and education programs and school-age childcare services in Rhode
Island.
(d) Any licensed child care facility including, but not limited to, a licensed child care center,
licensed family child care home, group family child care home, or licensed school age program,
that applies for a BrightStars quality rating and improvement system (“QRIS”) rating shall have
the sum of all applicable standards averaged to determine the final awarded rating or star level.
(e) The department of human services shall ensure that the methodology used to calculate
the final awarded rating under subsection (d) of this section is transparent, publicly available, and
consistently applied to all participating licensed child care facilities.
(f) Nothing in subsection (d) of this section shall alter the existing provision that any
licensed child care facility upon receiving national accreditation status shall be awarded a five star
overall assessment through the QRIS.
(g) The department shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to implement the
provisions of this section, including guidance on the calculation methodology, appeals process, and
public reporting of ratings.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005553
========
LC005553 - Page 2 of 3